src/fst/morphology/affixes/prefixes.lexc
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the Apurinã language are bound to beginning of other words.
LEXICON Prefixes
 PERSON_PREFIXES ;


LEXICON PERSON_PREFIXES
@P.PN.SG1@:@P.PN.SG1@n%{hØ%}%{yiØ%}%< NV_LEX ;
@P.PN.PL1@:@P.PN.PL1@%{aã%}%< NV_LEX ;
@P.PN.PL1@@P.EO.PhonNasal@:@P.PN.PL1@@P.EO.PhonNasal@%{aã%}%^VowNasL%< NV_LEX ;
@P.PN.SG2@:@P.PN.SG2@p%{yiØ%}%< NV_LEX ;
@P.PN.SG2@@P.EO.inoty@:@P.PN.SG2@@P.EO.inoty@p%{yiØ%}%^I1%< NV_LEX ;
@P.PN.PL2@:@P.PN.PL2@h%{ỹĩØ%}%< NV_LEX ;
@P.PN.PL2@@P.VAR.iy@:@P.PN.PL2@@P.VAR.iy@@h%{ỹĩØ%}%^VowY2I%< NV_LEX ; !tag me 2025-03-13
@P.PN.SG3M@:@P.PN.SG3M@%{yiØ%}%< NV_LEX ;
@P.PN.SG3F@:@P.PN.SG3F@%{uũ%}%< NV_LEX ;
@P.PN.SG3F@@P.EO.PhonNasal@:@P.PN.SG3F@@P.EO.PhonNasal@%{uũ%}%^VowNasL%< NV_LEX ;
@P.PN.PL3M@:@P.PN.PL3M@%{yiØ%}%< NV_LEX ;
@P.PN.PL3F@:@P.PN.PL3F@%{uũ%}%< NV_LEX ;
@P.PN.PL3F@@P.EO.PhonNasal@:@P.PN.PL3F@@P.EO.PhonNasal@%{uũ%}%^VowNasL%< NV_LEX ;
@U.PossD-Y.On@:@U.PossD-Y.On@ka%< Nouns ;

LEXICON NV_LEX
Nouns ;
Verbs ;
Propernouns ;!checkme

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
